Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A pharmacist may dispense ivermectin to a person, without


requiring a prescription order from a licensed health care


practitioner, in accordance with any written standardized procedures


or protocols issued by the State Board of Pharmacy including, if


required, providing the person with instructions on the proper use


of ivermectin.


B. Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist acting in a


reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or



Req. No. 3513 Page 1


subject to professional disciplinary action for dispensing


ivermectin in accordance with this section.


C. The Board may promulgate rules as necessary to implement


this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3513 DC 1/15/2026 8:43:01 AM



































Req. No. 3513 Page 2